Maryland, session 2025, HB0220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(s) “Tier 1 renewable source” means one or more of the following types of energy
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0220*

HOUSE BILL 220
sources:
(1) solar energy, including energy from photovoltaic technologies and solar
water heating systems;
(2) wind;
(3) qualifying biomass;
(4) methane from the anaerobic decomposition of organic materials in a
landfill or wastewater treatment plant;
(5) geothermal, including energy generated through geothermal exchange
from or thermal energy avoided by, groundwater or a shallow ground source;
(6) ocean, including energy from waves, tides, currents, and thermal
differences;
(7) a fuel cell that produces electricity from a Tier 1 renewable source
under item (3) or (4) of this subsection;
(8) a small hydroelectric power plant of less than 30 megawatts in capacity
that is licensed or exempt from licensing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(9) poultry litter–to–energy;
(10) [waste–to–energy;
(11) refuse–derived fuel;
(12)] thermal energy from a thermal biomass system; and
[(13)] (11) raw or treated wastewater used as a heat source or sink for a
heating or cooling system.
7–704.
(a) (1) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source:
(i) is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio
standard regardless of when the generating system or facility was placed in service; and
(ii) may be applied to the percentage requirements of the standard
for either Tier 1 renewable sources or Tier 2 renewable sources.
(2) (i) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(1), (5),
OR (9)[, (10), or (11)] of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy

HOUSE BILL 220 3
portfolio standard only if the source is connected with the electric distribution grid serving
Maryland.
(ii) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(13)] §
7–701(S)(11) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy
portfolio standard only if the source:
1. is connected with the electric distribution grid serving
Maryland; or
2. processes wastewater from Maryland residents.
(iii) If the owner of a solar generating system in this State chooses to
sell solar renewable energy credits from that system, the owner must first offer the credits
for sale to an electricity supplier or electric company that shall apply them toward
compliance with the renewable energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle.
(3) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(8) of this
subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard if it is
generated at a dam that existed as of January 1, 2004, even if a system or facility that is
capable of generating electricity did not exist on that date.
(4) Energy from a Tier 2 renewable source under § 7–701(t) of this subtitle
is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard if it is generated
at a system or facility that existed and was operational as of January 1, 2004, even if the
facility or system was not capable of generating electricity on that date.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
renewable energy portfolio standard compliance years starting on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.